Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF255.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko H.F. 255 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 147J.1 Psychology 1 interjurisdictional compact. 2 The psychology interjurisdictional compact is enacted into 3 law and entered into by this state with all states legally 4 joining in the compact in the form substantially as follows: 5 1. Article I ââ Purpose. 6 a. The party states find that: 7 (1) States license psychologists, in order to protect 8 the public through verification of education, training, 9 and experience, and ensure accountability for professional 10 practice. 11 (2) This compact is intended to regulate the day-to-day 12 practice of telepsychology, in which psychological services are 13 provided using telecommunication technologies, by psychologists 14 across state boundaries in the performance of their 15 psychological practice as assigned by an appropriate authority. 16 (3) This compact is intended to regulate the temporary 17 in-person, face-to-face practice of psychology by psychologists 18 across state boundaries for thirty days within a calendar year 19 in the performance of their psychological practice as assigned 20 by an appropriate authority. 21 (4) This compact is intended to authorize state psychology 22 regulatory authorities to afford legal recognition, in a manner 23 consistent with the terms of the compact, to psychologists 24 licensed in another state. 25 (5) This compact recognizes that states have a vested 26 interest in protecting the publicâs health and safety through 27 their licensing and regulation of psychologists and that such 28 state regulation will best protect public health and safety. 29 (6) This compact does not apply when a psychologist is 30 licensed in both the home and receiving states. 31 (7) This compact does not apply to permanent in-person, 32 face-to-face practice, but it does allow for authorization of 33 temporary psychological practice. 34 b. Consistent with these principles, this compact is 35 -1- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 1/ 31 H.F. 255 designed to achieve the following purposes and objectives: 1 (1) Increase public access to professional psychological 2 services by allowing for telepsychological practice across 3 state lines as well as temporary in-person, face-to-face 4 services into a state in which the psychologist is not licensed 5 to practice psychology. 6 (2) Enhance the statesâ ability to protect the publicâs 7 health and safety, especially client-patient safety. 8 (3) Encourage the cooperation of compact states in the areas 9 of psychology licensure and regulation. 10 (4) Facilitate the exchange of information between compact 11 states regarding psychologist licensure, adverse actions, and 12 disciplinary history. 13 (5) Promote compliance with the laws governing 14 psychological practice in each compact state. 15 (6) Invest all compact states with the authority to 16 hold licensed psychologists accountable through the mutual 17 recognition of compact state licenses. 18 2. Article II ââ Definitions. 19 a. âAdverse actionâ means any action taken by a state 20 psychology regulatory authority which finds a violation 21 of a statute or regulation that is identified by the state 22 psychology regulatory authority as discipline and is a matter 23 of public record. 24 b. âAssociation of state and provincial psychology boardsâ 25 means the recognized membership organization composed of state 26 and provincial psychology regulatory authorities responsible 27 for the licensure and registration of psychologists throughout 28 the United States and Canada. 29 c. âAuthority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychologyâ 30 means a licensed psychologistâs authority to practice 31 telepsychology, within the limits authorized under this 32 compact, in another compact state. 33 d. âBylawsâ means those bylaws established by the psychology 34 interjurisdictional compact commission pursuant to article 35 -2- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 2/ 31 H.F. 255 X for its governance, or for directing and controlling its 1 actions and conduct. 2 e. âClient-patientâ means the recipient of psychological 3 services, whether psychological services are delivered in the 4 context of health care, corporate, supervision, or consulting 5 services. 6 f. âCommissionerâ means the voting representative appointed 7 by each state psychology regulatory authority pursuant to 8 article X. 9 g. âCompact stateâ means a state, the District of Columbia, 10 or United States territory that has enacted this compact 11 legislation and which has not withdrawn pursuant to article 12 XIII, or been terminated pursuant to article XII. 13 h. âConfidentialityâ means the principle that data or 14 information is not made available or disclosed to unauthorized 15 persons or processes. 16 i. âCoordinated licensure information systemâ or âcoordinated 17 databaseâ means an integrated process for collecting, storing, 18 and sharing information on psychologistsâ licensure and 19 enforcement activities related to psychology licensure laws, 20 which is administered by the recognized membership organization 21 composed of state and provincial psychology regulatory 22 authorities. 23 j. âDayâ means any part of a day in which psychological work 24 is performed. 25 k. âDistant stateâ means the compact state where a 26 psychologist is physically present, not through the use 27 of telecommunications technologies, to provide temporary 28 in-person, face-to-face psychological services. 29 l. âE.Passportâ means a certificate issued by the 30 association of state and provincial psychology boards 31 that promotes the standardization in the criteria of 32 interjurisdictional telepsychology practice and facilitates the 33 process for licensed psychologists to provide telepsychological 34 services across state lines. 35 -3- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 3/ 31 H.F. 255 m. âExecutive boardâ means a group of directors elected or 1 appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to 2 them by, the commission. 3 n. âHome stateâ means a compact state where a psychologist 4 is licensed to practice psychology. If the psychologist is 5 licensed in more than one compact state and is practicing 6 under the authorization to practice interjurisdictional 7 telepsychology, the home state is the compact state where the 8 psychologist is physically present when the telepsychological 9 services are delivered. If the psychologist is licensed 10 in more than one compact state and is practicing under the 11 temporary authorization to practice, the home state is any 12 compact state where the psychologist is licensed. 13 o. âIdentity history summaryâ means a summary of information 14 retained by the federal bureau of investigation (FBI), or other 15 designee with similar authority, in connection with arrests 16 and, in some instances, federal employment, naturalization, or 17 military service. 18 p. âIn-person, face-to-faceâ means interactions in which the 19 psychologist and the client-patient are in the same physical 20 space and which does not include interactions that may occur 21 through the use of telecommunication technologies. 22 q. âInterjurisdictional practice certificateâ or âIPCâ 23 means a certificate issued by the association of state and 24 provincial psychology boards that grants temporary authority 25 to practice based on notification to the state psychology 26 regulatory authority of intention to practice temporarily, and 27 verification of oneâs qualifications for such practice. 28 r. âLicenseâ means authorization by a state psychology 29 regulatory authority to engage in the independent practice of 30 psychology, which would be unlawful without the authorization. 31 s. âNoncompact stateâ means any state which is not at the 32 time a compact state. 33 t. âPsychologistâ means an individual licensed for the 34 independent practice of psychology. 35 -4- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 4/ 31 H.F. 255 u. âPsychology interjurisdictional compact commissionâ or 1 âcommissionâ means the national administration of which all 2 compact states are members. 3 v. âReceiving stateâ means a compact state where the 4 client-patient is physically located when the telepsychological 5 services are delivered. 6 w. âRuleâ means a written statement by the psychology 7 interjurisdictional compact commission promulgated pursuant 8 to article XI that is of general applicability, implements, 9 interprets, or prescribes a policy or provision of this 10 compact, or an organizational, procedural, or practice 11 requirement of the commission and has the force and effect of 12 statutory law in a compact state, and includes the amendment, 13 repeal, or suspension of an existing rule. 14 x. âSignificant investigatory informationâ means any of the 15 following: 16 (1) Investigative information that a state psychology 17 regulatory authority, after a preliminary inquiry that includes 18 notification and an opportunity to respond if required by state 19 law, has reason to believe, if proven true, would indicate more 20 than a violation of state statute or ethics code that would be 21 considered more substantial than a minor infraction. 22 (2) Investigative information that indicates that the 23 psychologist represents an immediate threat to public health 24 and safety regardless of whether the psychologist has been 25 notified or had an opportunity to respond. 26 y. âStateâ means a state, commonwealth, territory, or 27 possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia. 28 z. âState psychology regulatory authorityâ means the board, 29 office, or other agency with the legislative mandate to license 30 and regulate the practice of psychology. 31 aa. âTelepsychologyâ means the provision of psychological 32 services using telecommunication technologies. 33 ab. âTemporary authorization to practiceâ means a licensed 34 psychologistâs authority to conduct temporary in-person, 35 -5- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 5/ 31 H.F. 255 face-to-face practice, within the limits authorized under this 1 compact, in another compact state. 2 ac. âTemporary in-person, face-to-face practiceâ means where 3 a psychologist is physically present, not through the use 4 of telecommunications technologies, in the distant state to 5 provide for the practice of psychology for thirty days within a 6 calendar year and based on notification to the distant state. 7 3. Article III ââ Home state licensure. 8 a. The home state shall be a compact state where a 9 psychologist is licensed to practice psychology. 10 b. A psychologist may hold one or more compact state 11 licenses at a time. If the psychologist is licensed in more 12 than one compact state, the home state is the compact state 13 where the psychologist is physically present when the services 14 are delivered as authorized by the authority to practice 15 interjurisdictional telepsychology under the terms of this 16 compact. 17 c. Any compact state may require a psychologist not 18 previously licensed in a compact state to obtain and retain 19 a license to be authorized to practice in the compact state 20 under circumstances not authorized by the authority to practice 21 interjurisdictional telepsychology under the terms of this 22 compact. 23 d. Any compact state may require a psychologist to obtain 24 and retain a license to be authorized to practice in a 25 compact state under circumstances not authorized by temporary 26 authorization to practice under the terms of this compact. 27 e. A home stateâs license authorizes a psychologist to 28 practice in a receiving state under the authority to practice 29 interjurisdictional telepsychology only if the compact state 30 meets all of the following requirements: 31 (1) Currently requires the psychologist to hold an active 32 E.Passport. 33 (2) Has a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating 34 complaints about licensed individuals. 35 -6- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 6/ 31 H.F. 255 (3) Notifies the commission, in compliance with the terms 1 herein, of any adverse action or significant investigatory 2 information regarding a licensed individual. 3 (4) Requires an identity history summary of all applicants 4 at initial licensure, including the use of the results of 5 fingerprints or other biometric data checks compliant with the 6 requirements of the federal bureau of investigation (FBI), or 7 other designee with similar authority, no later than ten years 8 after activation of the this compact. 9 (5) Complies with the bylaws and rules of the commission. 10 f. A home stateâs license grants temporary authorization 11 to practice to a psychologist in a distant state only if the 12 compact state meets all of the following requirements: 13 (1) Currently requires the psychologist to hold an active 14 IPC. 15 (2) Has a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating 16 complaints about licensed individuals. 17 (3) Notifies the commission, in compliance with the terms 18 herein, of any adverse action or significant investigatory 19 information regarding a licensed individual. 20 (4) Requires an identity history summary of all applicants 21 at initial licensure, including the use of the results of 22 fingerprints or other biometric data checks compliant with the 23 requirements of the federal bureau of investigation (FBI), or 24 other designee with similar authority, no later than ten years 25 after activation of this compact. 26 (5) Complies with the bylaws and rules of the commission. 27 4. Article IV ââ Compact privilege to practice 28 telepsychology. 29 a. Compact states shall recognize the right of a 30 psychologist, licensed in a compact state in conformance with 31 article III, to practice telepsychology in receiving states in 32 which the psychologist is not licensed, under the authority to 33 practice interjurisdictional telepsychology as provided in this 34 compact. 35 -7- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 7/ 31 H.F. 255 b. To exercise the authority to practice interjurisdictional 1 telepsychology under the terms and provisions of this compact, 2 a psychologist licensed to practice in a compact state shall 3 meet all of the following requirements: 4 (1) Hold a graduate degree in psychology from an institution 5 of higher education that was either of the following, at the 6 time the degree was awarded: 7 (a) Regionally accredited by an accrediting body recognized 8 by the United States department of education to grant graduate 9 degrees, or authorized by provincial statute or royal charter 10 to grant doctoral degrees. 11 (b) A foreign college or university deemed to be equivalent 12 to subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (a), by a foreign 13 credential evaluation service that is a member of the national 14 association of credential evaluation services or by a 15 recognized foreign credential evaluation service. 16 (2) Hold a graduate degree in psychology that meets all of 17 the following criteria: 18 (a) The program, wherever it may be administratively 19 housed, must be clearly identified and labeled as a 20 psychology program. Such a program must specify in pertinent 21 institutional catalogues and brochures its intent to educate 22 and train professional psychologists. 23 (b) The psychology program must stand as a recognizable, 24 coherent, organizational entity within the institution. 25 (c) There must be a clear authority and primary 26 responsibility for the core and specialty areas whether or not 27 the program cuts across administrative lines. 28 (d) The program must consist of an integrated, organized 29 sequence of study. 30 (e) There must be an identifiable psychology 31 faculty sufficient in size and breadth to carry out its 32 responsibilities. 33 (f) The designated director of the program must be a 34 psychologist and a member of the core faculty. 35 -8- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 8/ 31 H.F. 255 (g) The program must have an identifiable body of students 1 who are matriculated in that program for a degree. 2 (h) The program must include supervised practicum, 3 internship, or field training appropriate to the practice of 4 psychology. 5 (i) The curriculum shall encompass a minimum of three 6 academic years of full-time graduate study for doctoral degrees 7 and a minimum of one academic year of full-time graduate study 8 for masterâs degrees. 9 (j) The program includes an acceptable residency as defined 10 by the rules of the commission. 11 (3) Possess a current, full, and unrestricted license to 12 practice psychology in a home state which is a compact state. 13 (4) Have no history of adverse action that violates the 14 rules of the commission. 15 (5) Have no criminal record history reported on an identity 16 history summary that violates the rules of the commission. 17 (6) Possess a current, active E.Passport. 18 (7) Provide attestations in regard to areas of intended 19 practice, conformity with standards of practice, competence in 20 telepsychology technology; criminal background; and knowledge 21 and adherence to legal requirements in the home and receiving 22 states, and provide a release of information to allow for 23 primary source verification in a manner specified by the 24 commission. 25 (8) Meet other criteria as defined by the rules of the 26 commission. 27 c. The home state maintains authority over the license of 28 any psychologist practicing into a receiving state under the 29 authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology. 30 d. A psychologist practicing into a receiving state under 31 the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology 32 shall be subject to the receiving stateâs scope of practice. 33 A receiving state may, in accordance with that stateâs due 34 process law, limit or revoke a psychologistâs authority to 35 -9- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 9/ 31 H.F. 255 practice interjurisdictional telepsychology in the receiving 1 state and may take any other necessary actions under the 2 receiving stateâs applicable law to protect the health and 3 safety of the receiving stateâs citizens. If a receiving state 4 takes action, the state shall promptly notify the home state 5 and the commission. 6 e. If a psychologistâs license in any home state or another 7 compact state, or any authority to practice interjurisdictional 8 telepsychology in any receiving state, is restricted, 9 suspended, or otherwise limited, the E.Passport shall be 10 revoked and the psychologist shall not be eligible to practice 11 telepsychology in a compact state under the authority to 12 practice interjurisdictional telepsychology. 13 5. Article V ââ Compact temporary authorization to practice. 14 a. Compact states shall also recognize the right of a 15 psychologist, licensed in a compact state in conformance with 16 article III, to practice temporarily in distant states in which 17 the psychologist is not licensed, as provided in this compact. 18 b. To exercise the temporary authorization to practice 19 under the terms and provisions of this compact, a psychologist 20 licensed to practice in a compact state shall meet all of the 21 following requirements: 22 (1) Hold a graduate degree in psychology from an institution 23 of higher education that was either of the following, at the 24 time the degree was awarded: 25 (a) Regionally accredited by an accrediting body recognized 26 by the United States department of education to grant graduate 27 degrees, or authorized by provincial statute or royal charter 28 to grant doctoral degrees. 29 (b) A foreign college or university deemed to be equivalent 30 to subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (a), by a foreign 31 credential evaluation service that is a member of the national 32 association of credential evaluation services or by a 33 recognized foreign credential evaluation service. 34 (2) Hold a graduate degree in psychology that meets all of 35 -10- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 10/ 31 H.F. 255 the following criteria: 1 (a) The program, wherever it may be administratively 2 housed, must be clearly identified and labeled as a 3 psychology program. Such a program must specify in pertinent 4 institutional catalogues and brochures its intent to educate 5 and train professional psychologists. 6 (b) The psychology program must stand as a recognizable, 7 coherent, organizational entity within the institution. 8 (c) There must be a clear authority and primary 9 responsibility for the core and specialty areas whether or not 10 the program cuts across administrative lines. 11 (d) The program must consist of an integrated, organized 12 sequence of study. 13 (e) There must be an identifiable psychology 14 faculty sufficient in size and breadth to carry out its 15 responsibilities. 16 (f) The designated director of the program must be a 17 psychologist and a member of the core faculty. 18 (g) The program must have an identifiable body of students 19 who are matriculated in that program for a degree. 20 (h) The program must include supervised practicum, 21 internship, or field training appropriate to the practice of 22 psychology. 23 (i) The curriculum shall encompass a minimum of three 24 academic years of full-time graduate study for doctoral degrees 25 and a minimum of one academic year of full-time graduate study 26 for masterâs degrees. 27 (j) The program includes an acceptable residency as defined 28 by the rules of the commission. 29 (3) Possess a current, full, and unrestricted license to 30 practice psychology in a home state which is a compact state. 31 (4) Have no history of adverse action that violates the 32 rules of the commission. 33 (5) Have no criminal record history that violates the rules 34 of the commission. 35 -11- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 11/ 31 H.F. 255 (6) Possess a current, active IPC. 1 (7) Provide attestations in regard to areas of intended 2 practice and work experience and provide a release of 3 information to allow for primary source verification in a 4 manner specified by the commission. 5 (8) Meet other criteria as defined by the rules of the 6 commission. 7 c. A psychologist practicing into a distant state under the 8 temporary authorization to practice shall practice within the 9 scope of practice authorized by the distant state. 10 d. A psychologist practicing into a distant state under the 11 temporary authorization to practice shall be subject to the 12 distant stateâs authority and law. A distant state may, in 13 accordance with that stateâs due process law, limit or revoke 14 a psychologistâs temporary authorization to practice in the 15 distant state and may take any other necessary actions under 16 the distant stateâs applicable law to protect the health and 17 safety of the distant stateâs citizens. If a distant state 18 takes action, the state shall promptly notify the home state 19 and the commission. 20 e. If a psychologistâs license in any home state, another 21 compact state, or any temporary authorization to practice in 22 any distant state, is restricted, suspended, or otherwise 23 limited, the IPC shall be revoked and the psychologist shall 24 not be eligible to practice in a compact state under the 25 temporary authorization to practice. 26 6. Article VI ââ Conditions of telepsychology practice in a 27 receiving state. 28 a. A psychologist may practice in a receiving state under 29 the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology 30 only in the performance of the scope of practice for psychology 31 as assigned by an appropriate state psychology regulatory 32 authority, as defined in the rules of the commission, and under 33 the following circumstances: 34 (1) The psychologist initiates a client-patient contact 35 -12- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 12/ 31 H.F. 255 in a home state via telecommunications technologies with a 1 client-patient in a receiving state. 2 (2) Other conditions regarding telepsychology as determined 3 by rules promulgated by the commission. 4 7. Article VII ââ Adverse actions. 5 a. A home state shall have the power to impose adverse 6 action against a psychologistâs license issued by the home 7 state. A distant state shall have the power to take adverse 8 action on a psychologistâs temporary authorization to practice 9 within that distant state. 10 b. A receiving state may take adverse action on a 11 psychologistâs authority to practice interjurisdictional 12 telepsychology within that receiving state. A home state may 13 take adverse action against a psychologist based on an adverse 14 action taken by a distant state regarding temporary in-person, 15 face-to-face practice. 16 c. If a home state takes adverse action against a 17 psychologistâs license, that psychologistâs authority to 18 practice interjurisdictional telepsychology is terminated and 19 the E.Passport is revoked. Furthermore, that psychologistâs 20 temporary authorization to practice is terminated and the IPC 21 is revoked. 22 (1) All home state disciplinary orders which impose adverse 23 action shall be reported to the commission in accordance with 24 the rules promulgated by the commission. A compact state shall 25 report adverse actions in accordance with the rules of the 26 commission. 27 (2) In the event discipline is reported on a psychologist, 28 the psychologist shall not be eligible for telepsychology or 29 temporary in-person, face-to-face practice in accordance with 30 the rules of the commission. 31 (3) Other actions may be imposed as determined by the rules 32 promulgated by the commission. 33 d. A home stateâs psychology regulatory authority shall 34 investigate and take appropriate action with respect to 35 -13- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 13/ 31 H.F. 255 reported inappropriate conduct engaged in by a licensee which 1 occurred in a receiving state as it would if such conduct had 2 occurred by a licensee within the home state. In such cases, 3 the home stateâs law shall control in determining any adverse 4 action against a psychologistâs license. 5 e. A distant stateâs psychology regulatory authority 6 shall investigate and take appropriate action with respect to 7 reported inappropriate conduct engaged in by a psychologist 8 practicing under temporary authorization to practice which 9 occurred in that distant state as it would if such conduct 10 had occurred by a licensee within the home state. In such 11 cases, the distant stateâs law shall control in determining any 12 adverse action against a psychologistâs temporary authorization 13 to practice. 14 f. Nothing in this compact shall override a compact stateâs 15 decision that a psychologistâs participation in an alternative 16 program may be used in lieu of adverse action and that such 17 participation shall remain nonpublic if required by the compact 18 stateâs law. Compact states shall require psychologists who 19 enter any alternative programs to not provide telepsychology 20 services under the authority to practice interjurisdictional 21 telepsychology or provide temporary psychological services 22 under the temporary authorization to practice in any other 23 compact state during the term of the alternative program. 24 g. No other judicial or administrative remedies shall 25 be available to a psychologist in the event a compact state 26 imposes an adverse action pursuant to paragraph âcâ . 27 8. Article VIII ââ Additional authorities invested in a 28 compact stateâs psychology regulatory authority. 29 a. In addition to any other powers granted under state law, 30 a compact stateâs psychology regulatory authority shall have 31 the authority under this compact to do all of the following: 32 (1) Issue subpoenas, for both hearings and investigations, 33 which require the attendance and testimony of witnesses and 34 the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a compact 35 -14- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 14/ 31 H.F. 255 stateâs psychology regulatory authority for the attendance 1 and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from 2 another compact state shall be enforced in the latter state by 3 any court of competent jurisdiction, according to that courtâs 4 practice and procedure in considering subpoenas issued in its 5 own proceedings. The issuing state psychology regulatory 6 authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, 7 and other fees required by the service statutes of the state 8 where the witnesses or evidence are located. 9 (2) Issue cease and desist or injunctive relief 10 orders to revoke a psychologistâs authority to practice 11 interjurisdictional telepsychology or temporary authorization 12 to practice. 13 (3) During the course of any investigation, a psychologist 14 may not change the psychologistâs home state licensure. A 15 home state psychology regulatory authority is authorized to 16 complete any pending investigations of a psychologist and 17 to take any actions appropriate under its law. The home 18 state psychology regulatory authority shall promptly report 19 the conclusions of such investigations to the commission. 20 Once an investigation has been completed, and pending the 21 outcome of said investigation, the psychologist may change the 22 psychologistâs home state licensure. The commission shall 23 promptly notify the new home state of any such decisions as 24 provided in the rules of the commission. All information 25 provided to the commission or distributed by compact states 26 pursuant to the psychologist shall be confidential, filed under 27 seal, and used for investigatory or disciplinary matters. 28 The commission may create additional rules for mandated or 29 discretionary sharing of information by compact states. 30 9. Article IX ââ Coordinated licensure information system. 31 a. The commission shall provide for the development and 32 maintenance of a coordinated licensure information system and 33 reporting system containing licensure and disciplinary action 34 information on all psychologists individuals to whom this 35 -15- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 15/ 31 H.F. 255 compact is applicable in all compact states as defined by the 1 rules of the commission. 2 b. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the 3 contrary, a compact state shall submit a uniform data set to 4 the coordinated database on all licensees as required by the 5 rules of the commission, including all of the following: 6 (1) Identifying information. 7 (2) Licensure data. 8 (3) Significant investigatory information. 9 (4) Adverse actions against a psychologistâs license. 10 (5) An indicator that a psychologistâs authority to 11 practice interjurisdictional telepsychology or temporary 12 authorization to practice is revoked. 13 (6) Nonconfidential information related to alternative 14 program participation information. 15 (7) Any denial of application for licensure, and the reasons 16 for such denial. 17 (8) Other information which may facilitate the 18 administration of this compact, as determined by the rules of 19 the commission. 20 c. The coordinated database administrator shall promptly 21 notify all compact states of any adverse action taken against, 22 or significant investigative information on, any licensee in a 23 compact state. 24 d. Compact states reporting information to the coordinated 25 database may designate information that may not be shared with 26 the public without the express permission of the compact state 27 reporting the information. 28 e. Any information submitted to the coordinated database 29 that is subsequently required to be expunged by the law of the 30 compact state reporting the information shall be removed from 31 the coordinated database. 32 10. Article X ââ Establishment of the psychology 33 interjurisdictional compact commission. 34 a. The compact states hereby create and establish a joint 35 -16- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 16/ 31 H.F. 255 public agency known as the psychology interjurisdictional 1 compact commission. 2 (1) The commission is a body politic and an instrumentality 3 of the compact states. 4 (2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against 5 the commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a 6 court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of 7 the commission is located. The commission may waive venue and 8 jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to 9 participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. 10 (3) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a 11 waiver of sovereign immunity. 12 b. Membership, voting, and meetings. 13 (1) The commission shall consist of one voting 14 representative appointed by each compact state who shall serve 15 as that stateâs commissioner. The state psychology regulatory 16 authority shall appoint its delegate. This delegate shall be 17 empowered to act on behalf of the compact state. This delegate 18 shall be limited to one of the following: 19 (a) The executive director, executive secretary, or similar 20 executive. 21 (b) A current member of the state psychology regulatory 22 authority of a compact state. 23 (c) A designee empowered with the appropriate delegate 24 authority to act on behalf of the compact state. 25 (2) Any commissioner may be removed or suspended from office 26 as provided by the law of the state from which the commissioner 27 is appointed. Any vacancy occurring in the commission shall 28 be filled in accordance with the laws of the compact state in 29 which the vacancy exists. 30 (3) Each commissioner shall be entitled to one vote with 31 regard to the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws 32 and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in 33 the business and affairs of the commission. A commissioner 34 shall vote in person or by such other means as provided 35 -17- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 17/ 31 H.F. 255 in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for commissionersâ 1 participation in meetings by telephone or other means of 2 communication. 3 (4) The commission shall meet at least once during each 4 calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth 5 in the bylaws. 6 (5) All meetings shall be open to the public, and public 7 notice of meetings shall be given in the same manner as 8 required under the rulemaking provisions in article XI. 9 (6) The commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic 10 meeting if the commission must discuss any of the following: 11 (a) Noncompliance of a compact state with its obligations 12 under this compact. 13 (b) The employment, compensation, discipline, or other 14 personnel matters, practices, or procedures related to specific 15 employees or other matters related to the commissionâs internal 16 personnel practices and procedures. 17 (c) Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated 18 litigation against the commission. 19 (d) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of 20 goods, services, or real estate. 21 (e) Accusation against any person of a crime or formal 22 censure of any person. 23 (f) Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial 24 information which is privileged or confidential. 25 (g) Disclosure of information of a personal nature where 26 disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of 27 personal privacy. 28 (h) Disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law 29 enforcement purposes. 30 (i) Disclosure of information related to any investigatory 31 reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the 32 commission or other committee charged with responsibility for 33 investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant 34 to the compact. 35 -18- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 18/ 31 H.F. 255 (j) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by 1 federal and state statute. 2 (7) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed 3 pursuant to subparagraph (6), the commissionâs legal counsel or 4 designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall 5 reference each relevant exempting provision. The commission 6 shall keep minutes which fully and clearly describe all matters 7 discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate 8 summary of actions taken, of any person participating in the 9 meeting, and the reasons therefore, including a description of 10 the views expressed. All documents considered in connection 11 with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All 12 minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under 13 seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of the 14 commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction. 15 c. The commission shall, by a majority vote of the 16 commissioners, prescribe bylaws or rules to govern its conduct 17 as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes 18 and exercise the powers of this compact, including but not 19 limited to or providing for all of the following: 20 (1) Establishing the fiscal year of the commission. 21 (2) Providing reasonable standards and procedures for all 22 of the following: 23 (a) The establishment and meetings of other committees. 24 (b) Governing any general or specific delegation of any 25 authority or function of the commission. 26 (3) Providing reasonable procedures for calling and 27 conducting meetings of the commission, ensuring reasonable 28 advance notice of all meetings and providing an opportunity 29 for attendance of such meetings by interested parties, 30 with enumerated exceptions designed to protect the publicâs 31 interest, the privacy of individuals of such proceedings, 32 and proprietary information, including trade secrets. The 33 commission may meet in closed session only after a majority 34 of the commissioners vote to close a meeting to the public in 35 -19- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 19/ 31 H.F. 255 whole or in part. As soon as practicable, the commission shall 1 make public a copy of the vote to close the meeting revealing 2 the vote of each commissioner with no proxy votes allowed. 3 (4) Establishing the titles, duties, and authority and 4 reasonable procedures for the election of the officers of the 5 commission. 6 (5) Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the 7 establishment of the personnel policies and programs of the 8 commission. Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar 9 law of any compact state, the bylaws shall exclusively govern 10 the personnel policies and programs of the commission. 11 (6) Promulgating a code of ethics to address permissible and 12 prohibited activities of commission members and employees. 13 (7) Providing a mechanism for concluding the operations of 14 the commission and the equitable disposition of any surplus 15 funds that may exist after the termination of the compact after 16 the payment or reserving of all of its debts and obligations. 17 (8) The commission shall publish its bylaws in a convenient 18 form and file a copy thereof and a copy of any amendment 19 thereto, with the appropriate agency or officer in each of the 20 compact states. 21 (9) The commission shall maintain its financial records in 22 accordance with the bylaws. 23 (10) The commission shall meet and take such actions as are 24 consistent with the provisions of this compact and the bylaws. 25 d. The commission shall have all of the following powers: 26 (1) The authority to promulgate uniform rules to facilitate 27 and coordinate implementation and administration of this 28 compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law and 29 shall be binding in all compact states. 30 (2) To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in 31 the name of the commission, provided that the standing of any 32 state psychology regulatory authority or other regulatory body 33 responsible for psychology licensure to sue or be sued under 34 applicable law shall not be affected. 35 -20- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 20/ 31 H.F. 255 (3) To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds. 1 (4) To borrow, accept, or contract for services of 2 personnel, including but not limited to employees of a compact 3 state. 4 (5) To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix 5 compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate 6 authority to carry out the purposes of the compact, and to 7 establish the commissionâs personnel policies and programs 8 relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, 9 and other related personnel matters. 10 (6) To accept any and all appropriate donations and grants 11 of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and to 12 receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at all 13 times the commission shall strive to avoid any appearance of 14 impropriety or conflict of interest. 15 (7) To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or 16 donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve, or use, 17 any property, real, personal, or mixed; provided that at all 18 times the commission shall strive to avoid any appearance of 19 impropriety. 20 (8) To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, 21 abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, 22 or mixed. 23 (9) To establish a budget and make expenditures. 24 (10) To borrow money. 25 (11) To appoint committees, including advisory committees 26 comprised of members, state regulators, state legislators or 27 their representatives, and consumer representatives, and such 28 other interested persons as may be designated in this compact 29 and the bylaws. 30 (12) To provide and receive information from, and to 31 cooperate with, law enforcement agencies. 32 (13) To adopt and use an official seal. 33 (14) To perform such other functions as may be necessary or 34 appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact consistent 35 -21- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 21/ 31 H.F. 255 with the state regulation of psychology licensure, temporary 1 in-person, face-to-face practice, and telepsychology practice. 2 e. The executive board. 3 The elected officers shall serve as the executive board, 4 which shall have the power to act on behalf of the commission 5 according to the terms of this compact. 6 (1) The executive board shall be comprised of the following 7 six members: 8 (a) Five voting members who are elected from the current 9 membership of the commission by the commission. 10 (b) One ex officio, nonvoting member from the recognized 11 membership organization composed of state and provincial 12 psychology regulatory authorities. 13 (2) The ex officio member must have served as staff or 14 member on a state psychology regulatory authority and shall be 15 selected by its respective organization. 16 (3) The commission may remove any member of the executive 17 board as provided in the bylaws. 18 (4) The executive board shall meet at least annually. 19 (5) The executive board shall have all of the following 20 duties and responsibilities: 21 (a) Recommend to the entire commission changes to the rules 22 or bylaws, changes to this compact legislation, fees paid by 23 compact states such as annual dues, and any other applicable 24 fees. 25 (b) Ensure compact administration services are 26 appropriately provided, contractual or otherwise. 27 (c) Prepare and recommend the budget. 28 (d) Maintain financial records on behalf of the commission. 29 (e) Monitor compact compliance of member states and provide 30 compliance reports to the commission. 31 (f) Establish additional committees as necessary. 32 (g) Other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws. 33 f. Financing of the commission. 34 (1) The commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, 35 -22- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 22/ 31 H.F. 255 the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and 1 ongoing activities. 2 (2) The commission may accept any and all appropriate 3 revenue sources, donations and grants of money, equipment, 4 supplies, materials, and services. 5 (3) The commission may levy on and collect an annual 6 assessment from each compact state or impose fees on other 7 parties to cover the cost of the operations and activities of 8 the commission and its staff which must be in a total amount 9 sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year 10 for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The 11 aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based 12 upon a formula to be determined by the commission which shall 13 promulgate a rule binding upon all compact states. 14 (4) The commission shall not incur obligations of any kind 15 prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor 16 shall the commission pledge the credit of any of the compact 17 states, except by and with the authority of the compact state. 18 (5) The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all 19 receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of 20 the commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting 21 procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts 22 and disbursements of funds handled by the commission shall be 23 audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant and 24 the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of 25 the annual report of the commission. 26 g. Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification. 27 (1) The members, officers, executive director, employees, 28 and representatives of the commission shall be immune from suit 29 and liability, either personally or in their official capacity, 30 for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal 31 injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any 32 actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or 33 that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable 34 basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission 35 -23- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 23/ 31 H.F. 255 employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing 1 in this subparagraph shall be construed to protect any such 2 person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, 3 or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton 4 misconduct of that person. 5 (2) The commission shall defend any member, officer, 6 executive director, employee, or representative of the 7 commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability 8 arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission 9 that occurred within the scope of commission employment, 10 duties, or responsibilities, or that the person against 11 whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing 12 occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or 13 responsibilities; provided that nothing in this subparagraph 14 shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining the 15 personâs own counsel; and provided further, that the actual 16 or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that 17 personâs intentional or willful or wanton misconduct. 18 (3) The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless 19 any member, officer, executive director, employee, or 20 representative of the commission for the amount of any 21 settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising 22 out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that 23 occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, 24 or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable 25 basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission 26 employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the 27 actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from 28 the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. 29 11. Article XI ââ Rulemaking. 30 a. The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers 31 pursuant to the criteria set forth in this article XI and the 32 rules adopted under this article XI. Rules and amendments 33 shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or 34 amendment. 35 -24- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 24/ 31 H.F. 255 b. If a majority of the legislatures of the compact states 1 rejects a rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the 2 same manner used to adopt this compact, then such rule shall 3 have no further force and effect in any compact state. 4 c. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a 5 regular or special meeting of the commission. 6 d. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or 7 rules by the commission, and at least sixty days in advance 8 of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and voted 9 upon, the commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking 10 on both of the following: 11 (1) On the website of the commission. 12 (2) On the website of each compact stateâs psychology 13 regulatory authority or the publication in which each state 14 would otherwise publish proposed rules. 15 e. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include all of 16 the following: 17 (1) The proposed time, date, and location of the meeting in 18 which the rule will be considered and voted upon. 19 (2) The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the 20 reason for the proposed rule. 21 (3) A request for comments on the proposed rule from any 22 interested person. 23 (4) The manner in which interested persons may submit notice 24 to the commission of their intention to attend the public 25 hearing and any written comments. 26 f. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the commission 27 shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions, 28 and arguments, which shall be made available to the public. 29 g. The commission shall grant an opportunity for a public 30 hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment if a hearing is 31 requested by any of the following: 32 (1) At least twenty-five persons who submit comments 33 independently of each other. 34 (2) A governmental subdivision or agency. 35 -25- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 25/ 31 H.F. 255 (3) A duly appointed person in an association that has at 1 least twenty-five members. 2 h. If a hearing is held on the proposed rule or amendment, 3 the commission shall publish the place, time, and date of the 4 scheduled public hearing. 5 (1) All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall 6 notify the executive director of the commission or other 7 designated member in writing of their desire to appear and 8 testify at the hearing not less than five business days before 9 the scheduled date of the hearing. 10 (2) Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each 11 person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity 12 to comment orally or in writing. 13 (3) No transcript of the hearing is required, unless 14 a written request for a transcript is made, in which case 15 the person requesting the transcript shall bear the cost of 16 producing the transcript. A recording may be made in lieu of a 17 transcript under the same terms and conditions as a transcript. 18 This subparagraph shall not preclude the commission from making 19 a transcript or recording of the hearing if it so chooses. 20 (4) Nothing in this article shall be construed as requiring 21 a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the 22 convenience of the commission at hearings required by this 23 article. 24 i. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close 25 of business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was 26 not held, the commission shall consider all written and oral 27 comments received. 28 j. The commission shall, by majority vote of all members, 29 take final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the 30 effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking 31 record and the full text of the rule. 32 k. If no written notice of intent to attend the public 33 hearing by interested parties is received, the commission may 34 proceed with promulgation of the proposed rule without a public 35 -26- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 26/ 31 H.F. 255 hearing. 1 l. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the 2 commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without 3 prior notice, opportunity for comment, or hearing, provided 4 that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this compact 5 and in this article shall be retroactively applied to the rule 6 as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety 7 days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of 8 this paragraph, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted 9 immediately in order to address any of the following: 10 (1) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or 11 welfare. 12 (2) Prevent a loss of commission or compact state funds. 13 (3) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an 14 administrative rule that is established by federal law or rule. 15 (4) Protect public health and safety. 16 m. The commission or an authorized committee of the 17 commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule 18 or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, 19 errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. 20 Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website 21 of the commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge 22 by any person for a period of thirty days after posting. The 23 revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision 24 results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be 25 made in writing, and delivered to the chair of the commission 26 prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is 27 made, the revision will take effect without further action. If 28 the revision is challenged, the revision shall not take effect 29 without the approval of the commission. 30 12. Article XII ââ Oversight, dispute resolution, and 31 enforcement. 32 a. Oversight. 33 (1) The executive, legislative, and judicial branches 34 of state government in each compact state shall enforce this 35 -27- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 27/ 31 H.F. 255 compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to 1 effectuate this compactâs purposes and intent. The provisions 2 of this compact and the rules promulgated under this compact 3 shall have standing as statutory law. 4 (2) All courts shall take judicial notice of this compact 5 and the rules in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a 6 compact state pertaining to the subject matter of this compact 7 which may affect the powers, responsibilities, or actions of 8 the commission. 9 (3) The commission shall be entitled to receive service 10 of process in any such proceeding, and shall have standing to 11 intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to 12 provide service of process to the commission shall render a 13 judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact, or 14 promulgated rules. 15 b. Default, technical assistance, and termination. 16 (1) If the commission determines that a compact state 17 has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or 18 responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated rules, 19 the commission shall do all of the following: 20 (a) Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other 21 compact states of the nature of the default, the proposed means 22 of remedying the default, or any other action to be taken by 23 the commission. 24 (b) Provide remedial training and specific technical 25 assistance regarding the default. 26 (2) If a state in default fails to remedy the default, the 27 defaulting state may be terminated from this compact upon an 28 affirmative vote of a majority of the compact states, and all 29 rights, privileges, and benefits conferred by this compact 30 shall be terminated on the effective date of termination. A 31 remedy of the default does not relieve the offending state 32 of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of 33 default. 34 (3) Termination of membership in this compact shall be 35 -28- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 28/ 31 H.F. 255 imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have 1 been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall 2 be submitted by the commission to the governor, the majority 3 and minority leaders of the defaulting stateâs legislature, and 4 each of the compact states. 5 (4) A compact state which has been terminated is 6 responsible for all assessments, obligations, and liabilities 7 incurred through the effective date of termination, including 8 obligations which extend beyond the effective date of 9 termination. 10 (5) The commission shall not bear any costs incurred by 11 the state which is found to be in default or which has been 12 terminated from this compact, unless agreed upon in writing 13 between the commission and the defaulting state. 14 (6) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the 15 commission by petitioning the United States district court for 16 the District of Columbia or the federal district where the 17 compact has its principal offices. The prevailing member shall 18 be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable 19 attorney fees. 20 c. Dispute resolution. 21 (1) Upon request by a compact state, the commission shall 22 attempt to resolve disputes related to this compact which arise 23 among compact states and between compact and noncompact states. 24 (2) The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for 25 both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes that 26 arise before the commission. 27 d. Enforcement. 28 (1) The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its 29 discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this 30 compact. 31 (2) By majority vote, the commission may initiate legal 32 action in the United States district court for the District 33 of Columbia or the federal district where the compact has 34 its principal offices against a compact state in default to 35 -29- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 29/ 31 H.F. 255 enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and its 1 promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include 2 both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial 3 enforcement is necessary, the prevailing member shall be 4 awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable 5 attorneyâs fees. 6 (3) The remedies in this article shall not be the exclusive 7 remedies of the commission. The commission may pursue any 8 other remedies available under federal or state law. 9 13. Article XIII ââ Date of implementation of the psychology 10 interjurisdictional compact commission and associated rules, 11 withdrawal, and amendments. 12 a. This compact shall come into effect on the date on which 13 the compact is enacted into law in the seventh compact state. 14 The provisions which become effective at that time shall be 15 limited to the powers granted to the commission relating to 16 assembly and the promulgation of rules. Thereafter, the 17 commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking powers necessary 18 to the implementation and administration of this compact. 19 b. Any state which joins the compact subsequent to the 20 commissionâs initial adoption of the rules shall be subject 21 to the rules as they exist on the date on which the compact 22 becomes law in that state. Any rule which has been previously 23 adopted by the commission shall have the full force and effect 24 of law on the day the compact becomes law in that state. 25 c. Any compact state may withdraw from this compact by 26 enacting a statute repealing the compact. 27 (1) A compact stateâs withdrawal shall not take effect until 28 six months after enactment of the repealing statute. 29 (2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement 30 of the withdrawing stateâs psychology regulatory authority to 31 comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting 32 requirements of this compact prior to the effective date of 33 withdrawal. 34 d. Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to 35 -30- LSB 2496YH (2) 91 ss/ko 30/ 31 H.F. 255 invalidate or prevent any psychology licensure agreement or 1 other cooperative arrangement between a compact state and a 2 noncompact state which does not conflict with the provisions of 3 this compact. 4 e. This compact may be amended by the compact states. No 5 amendment to this compact shall become effective and binding 6 upon any compact state until it is enacted into the law of all 7 compact states. 8 14. Article XIV ââ Construction and severability. This 9 compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the 10 purposes thereof. If this compact shall be held contrary to 11 the constitution of any compact state, the compact shall remain 12 in full force and effect as to the remaining compact states. 13